North Carolina, session 2025, HB174.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known as the "North Carolina Marriage Equality Act."
The purpose of this act is to codify the right of all individuals to marry, regardless of sex, gender,
or sexual orientation, ensuring equal treatment under the law in the State of North Carolina.
SECTION 2. Article 1 of Chapter 51 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
the following new sections to read:
"§ 51-5.6. Codification of marriage equality.
(a) Marriage is the legally recognized union of two consenting individuals, regardless of
sex, gender, or sexual orientation.
(b) All laws, policies, and regulations of the State of North Carolina and its political
subdivisions shall be applied equally to all married couples, regardless of the sex, gender, or
sexual orientation of the parties.
(c) No state or local government entity, agency, or official may refuse to recognize a
marriage legally performed under this section.
"§ 51-5.7. Protection against discrimination.
(a) No individual, corporation, association, or government entity may deny services,
benefits, rights, or responsibilities related to marriage based on sex, gender, or sexual orientation.
(b) Public officials responsible for issuing marriage licenses or performing civil
marriages shall not refuse to do so based on the sex, gender, or sexual orientation of the
applicants."
SECTION 3. G.S. 51-1.2 and G.S. 51-5.5 are repealed.
SECTION 4. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect
without the invalid provisions or application and, to this end, the provisions of this act are
severable.
SECTION 5. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H174-v-1*